test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VW_waawaatesi_gt-norm.yaml
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iwaawaatesiishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iwaawaatesiishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iwaawaatesiishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iwaawaatesiishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iwaawaatesiishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iwaawaatesiishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iwaawaatesiishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iwaawaatesiishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iwaawaatesiishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iwaawaatesiishiniibanan
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iwaawaatesiishiniibanag
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iwaawaatesiishiniibaning
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iwaawaatesiishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iwaawaatesiishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefwaawaatesi+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iwaawaatesiishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: waawaatesiensimishinaaniban
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: waawaatesiensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: waawaatesiensimishiwaaiban
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: waawaatesiensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: waawaatesiensimishiniiban
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: waawaatesiensimishini***idig, idog***
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: waawaatesienhimishinaaniban
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: waawaatesienhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: waawaatesienhimishiwaaiban
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: waawaatesienhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: waawaatesienhimishiniiban
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: waawaatesienhimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: waawaatesiensimishinaanan
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: waawaatesiensimishinaanag
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: waawaatesiensimishinaaning
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: waawaatesiensimishiwaaan
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: waawaatesiensimishiwaaag
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: waawaatesiensimishiwaaing
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: waawaatesiensimishinian
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: waawaatesiensimishiniag
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: waawaatesiensimishiniing
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: waawaatesienhimishinaanan
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: waawaatesienhimishinaanag
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: waawaatesienhimishinaaning
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: waawaatesienhimishiwaaan
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: waawaatesienhimishiwaaag
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: waawaatesienhimishiwaaing
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: waawaatesienhimishinian
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: waawaatesienhimishiniag
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: waawaatesienhimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: waawaatesiensimishibanan
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: waawaatesiensimishibanag
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: waawaatesiensimishibaning
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: waawaatesiensimish***idig, idog***an
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: waawaatesiensimish***idig, idog***ag
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: waawaatesiensimish***idig, idog***ing
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: waawaatesienhimishibanan
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: waawaatesienhimishibanag
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: waawaatesienhimishibaning
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: waawaatesienhimish***idig, idog***an
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: waawaatesienhimish***idig, idog***ag
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: waawaatesienhimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: waawaatesiensiminaanibanan
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: waawaatesiensiminaanibanag
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: waawaatesiensiminaanibaning
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: waawaatesiensiminaan***idig, idog***an
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: waawaatesiensiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: waawaatesiensiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: waawaatesiensimiwaaibanan
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: waawaatesiensimiwaaibanag
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: waawaatesiensimiwaaibaning
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: waawaatesiensimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: waawaatesiensimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: waawaatesiensimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: waawaatesiensiminiibanan
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: waawaatesiensiminiibanag
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: waawaatesiensiminiibaning
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: waawaatesiensimini***idig, idog***an
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: waawaatesiensimini***idig, idog***ag
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: waawaatesiensimini***idig, idog***ing
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: waawaatesienhiminaanibanan
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: waawaatesienhiminaanibanag
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: waawaatesienhiminaanibaning
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: waawaatesienhiminaan***idig, idog***an
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: waawaatesienhiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: waawaatesienhiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: waawaatesienhimiwaaibanan
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: waawaatesienhimiwaaibanag
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: waawaatesienhimiwaaibaning
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: waawaatesienhimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: waawaatesienhimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: waawaatesienhimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: waawaatesienhiminiibanan
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: waawaatesienhiminiibanag
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: waawaatesienhiminiibaning
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: waawaatesienhimini***idig, idog***an
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: waawaatesienhimini***idig, idog***ag
     waawaatesi+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: waawaatesienhimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6, 7
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: waawaatesiensishinaanibanan
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: waawaatesiensishinaanibanag
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: waawaatesiensishinaanibaning
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: waawaatesiensishinaan***idig, idog***an
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: waawaatesiensishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: waawaatesiensishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: waawaatesiensishiwaaibanan
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: waawaatesiensishiwaaibanag
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: waawaatesiensishiwaaibaning
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: waawaatesiensishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: waawaatesiensishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: waawaatesiensishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: waawaatesiensishiniibanan
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: waawaatesiensishiniibanag
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: waawaatesiensishiniibaning
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: waawaatesiensishini***idig, idog***an
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: waawaatesiensishini***idig, idog***ag
     waawaatesi+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: waawaatesiensishini***idig, idog***ing
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: waawaatesienhishinaanibanan
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: waawaatesienhishinaanibanag
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: waawaatesienhishinaanibaning
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: waawaatesienhishinaan***idig, idog***an
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: waawaatesienhishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: waawaatesienhishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: waawaatesienhishiwaaibanan
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: waawaatesienhishiwaaibanag
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: waawaatesienhishiwaaibaning
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: waawaatesienhishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: waawaatesienhishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: waawaatesienhishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: waawaatesienhishiniibanan
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: waawaatesienhishiniibanag
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: waawaatesienhishiniibaning
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: waawaatesienhishini***idig, idog***an
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: waawaatesienhishini***idig, idog***ag
     waawaatesi+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: waawaatesienhishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     waawaatesi+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: waawaatesiimishinaanibanan
     waawaatesi+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: waawaatesiimishinaanibanag
     waawaatesi+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: waawaatesiimishinaanibaning
     waawaatesi+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: waawaatesiimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     waawaatesi+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: waawaatesiimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     waawaatesi+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: waawaatesiimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     waawaatesi+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: waawaatesiimishiwaaibanan
     waawaatesi+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: waawaatesiimishiwaaibanag
     waawaatesi+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: waawaatesiimishiwaaibaning
     waawaatesi+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: waawaatesiimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     waawaatesi+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: waawaatesiimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     waawaatesi+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: waawaatesiimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     waawaatesi+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: waawaatesiimishiniibanan
     waawaatesi+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: waawaatesiimishiniibanag
     waawaatesi+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: waawaatesiimishiniibaning
     waawaatesi+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: waawaatesiimishini***idig, idog***an
     waawaatesi+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: waawaatesiimishini***idig, idog***ag
     waawaatesi+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: waawaatesiimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     +Px1waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: niwaawaatesiensimishinaaniban
     +Px1waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: niwaawaatesiensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: niwaawaatesiensimishiwaaiban
     +Px1waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: niwaawaatesiensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px1waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: niwaawaatesiensimishiniiban
     +Px1waawaatesi+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: niwaawaatesiensimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px1waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: niwaawaatesienhimishinaaniban
     +Px1waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: niwaawaatesienhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: niwaawaatesienhimishiwaaiban
     +Px1waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: niwaawaatesienhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px1waawaatesi+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: niwaawaatesienhimishiniiban
